Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-143
Claims; delinquent personal taxes; deduction.

The county board of any county, whenever the account or claim of any person, firm or corporation against the county is presented to them for allowance, shall procure from the county treasurer a certificate of the amount of delinquent personal taxes assessed against the person, firm or corporation in whose favor the account or claim is presented, and shall deduct from any amount found due upon such account or claim the amount of such tax, and shall forthwith issue a warrant for the balance remaining, if any.

Laws 1879, § 48, p. 368;

R.S.1913, § 973;

C.S.1922, § 873;

C.S.1929, § 26-127;

Laws 1933, c. 126, § 1, p. 501;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-127;

R.S.1943, § 23-143.

County board must deduct from claim delinquent personal property taxes. State ex rel. Bates v. Morgan, 154 Neb. 234, 47 N.W.2d 512 (1951).

Duty to deduct personal taxes rests upon county board, and cannot be delegated to another. State ex rel. Leidigh v. Johnson, 92 Neb. 736, 139 N.W. 669 (1913).

Board may deduct delinquent taxes from judgment on a claim. State ex rel. Hershiser v. Holt County, 89 Neb. 445, 131 N.W. 960 (1911).